Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-544
Storage; termination.

At the election of the warehouse licensee and under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission, storage in a warehouse operated by such licensee may be terminated on application to the commission and upon good cause shown according to the rules and regulations of the commission. Subject to such rules and regulations as the commission may adopt and promulgate, any storage contract on any or all such grain may be terminated by the owner at any time by the payment or tender of all legal charges and the surrender of the warehouse receipt, together with a demand for delivery of such grain or notice to sell the same.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 20;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 63.